en: Frozen sticks
fr: Bâtonnets glacés

en: Frozen fruit puree sticks
fr: Bâtonnets glacés à la purée de fruits

en: Frozen cones
fr: Cônes glacés

en: Sorbet cones
fr: Cônes au sorbet

en: Ice creams, ice cream
ab: аршәы
af: Roomys
am: አይስ ክሬም
ar: مثلجات
az: Dondurma
ba: туңдырма
be: марожанае
bg: Сладолед
bn: আইসক্রিম
br: dienn-skorn
bs: Sladoled
ca: gelat, gelats
cs: zmrzlina
cy: Hufen iâ
da: Flødeis, Is
de: Speiseeis, Eiskrem
el: Παγωτό
eo: glaciaĵo
es: helado, helados
et: jäätis
eu: Izozki
fa: بستنی
fi: jäätelö
fr: glaces, glace, crème glacée
fy: rjemme-iis
ga: Uachtar reoite
gd: Reòiteag
gl: Xeado
gn: Typy'are'ẽ
gu: આઇસ્ક્રીમ
gv: key riojey
he: גלידה
hi: आइसक्रीम
hr: sladoledi, sladoled
ht: krèm
hu: Jégkrémek, fagylalt
hy: Պաղպաղակ
ia: gelato
id: Es krim
is: Rjómaís
it: gelato
ja: アイスクリーム
jv: Ès krim
ka: ნაყინი
kk: балмұздақ
km: ការ៉េម
kn: ಐಸ್ ಕ್ರೀಂ
ko: 아이스크림
ku: Bestenî
kv: Лымвый
ky: мороженое
la: Glacies edibilis
lb: Glace
li: roumies
lo: ສີຄີມ ກ້ອນ
lt: Ledai
lv: saldējums
mi: aihikiriimi
mk: сладолед
ml: ഐസ്‌ക്രീം
mn: цэцгийн мэхээлдэс
mr: आईसक्रीम
ms: aiskrim
mt: ġelat
my: ရေခဲမုန့်
nb: iskrem
nl: roomijs, ijs
nn: iskrem
nv: Abeʼ yistiní
or: ଆଇସ କ୍ରୀମ
pa: ਆਈਸ ਕਰੀਮ
pl: Lody
pt: gelado
rm: glatsch
ro: Înghețată
ru: мороженое
se: lákcajiekŋa
sh: Sladoled
si: අයිස් ක්‍රීම්
sk: Zmrzlina
sl: Sladoled
sm: aisakulimi
so: Jalaato
sq: akullorja
sr: сладолед
st: aesekerimi
su: Éskrim
sv: Gräddglass, Glass
sw: aiskrimu
ta: குளிர்களி
te: ఐస్ క్రీం
tg: Яхмос
th: ไอศกรีม
tk: dongdurma
tl: Sorbetes
tr: Dondurma
tt: туңдырма
ug: ماروژنا
uk: морозиво
ur: آئس کریم
uz: muzqaymoq
vi: Kem
wo: galaas
yi: אייזקרעם
zh: 冰淇淋
zu: u-ayisikhilimu

en: Ice cream bars, Ice creams on a stick
de: Eis am Stiel, Stieleis
es: Helados de palo, Polos de helado, Paletas de helado, Paletas heladas
fi: jäätelöpuikot
fr: Bâtonnets à la crème glacée, Glaces Batonnets
hr: Štanglice sladoleda
hu: Fagylal szeletek, Fagylaltok pálcikán
it: Gelati a stecco, Gelatti in barretta
lt: Ledai ant pagaliuko, Ledų batonėliai
nl: IJsjes, IJscos, Friscos

en: Ice cream bar variety packs
de: Eis am Stiel Mischpackungen
es: Pacquetes variados de helados de palo
fr: Assortiments de bâtonnets glacés
hr: Raznolika pakiranja sladoledne ploče
it: Gelati a stecco confezione miste
nl: IJsjesassortimenten

en: Non-coated ice cream bars
fr: Bâtonnets à la crème glacée sans enrobage

en: Coated ice cream bars
fr: Bâtonnets à la crème glacée enrobés

en: Ice cream bars coated with fat-reduced cocoa
fr: Bâtonnets glacés enrobés de cacao maigre

en: Ice cream bars coated with fruit sorbet
fr: Bâtonnets glacés enrobés de sorbet aux fruits

en: Ice cream bars coated with chocolate, Chocolate ice cream bars, Chocolate ice creams on a stick, Ice cream on stick with chocolate coating
de: Eis am Stiel überzogen mit Schokolade, Schokoladeneis am Stiel, Stieleis Schokolade
es: Helados de palo de chocolate, Polos de chocolate, Paletas de chocolate
fi: Suklaajäätelötikut
fr: Bâtonnets glacés enrobés de chocolat, Bâtonnets glacés au chocolat, Bâtonnets au chocolat, Bâtonnet chocolat, Bâtonnets chocolat, Bâtonnet enrobé de crème glacée au chocolat, Bâtonnet enrobé de glace au chocolat
hr: Štanglice sladoleda od čokolade
it: Barrette al gelato al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai ledai ant pagaliuko
nl: Choco-ijsjes

en: Vanilla ice cream bars coated with dark chocolate
de: Vanilleeis am Stiel überzogen mit dunkle Schokolade
fr: Bâtonnets glacés vanille enrobés de chocolat noir

en: Vanilla ice cream bars coated with milk chocolate
de: Vanilleeis am Stiel überzogen mit Milchschokolade
fr: Bâtonnets glacés vanille enrobés de chocolat au lait

en: Vanilla ice cream bars coated with milk chocolate and almonds
de: Vanilleeis am Stiel überzogen mit Milchschokolade und Mandeln
fr: Bâtonnets glacés vanille enrobés de chocolat au lait aux amandes

en: Vanilla ice cream bars coated with white chocolate
de: Vanilleeis am Stiel überzogen mit weiße Schokolade
fr: Bâtonnets glacés vanille enrobés de chocolat blanc

en: Vanilla ice cream bars coated with white chocolate and almonds
de: Vanilleeis am Stiel überzogen mit weiße Schokolade und Mandeln
fr: Bâtonnets glacés vanille enrobés de chocolat blanc aux amandes

en: Ice cream cones, Ice cream cone
ca: Cons de gelat
de: Speiseeis Hörnchen, Eistüten
es: Conos de helado
fi: jäätelötuutit
fr: Cônes à la crème glacée
he: גביעי גלידה
hr: Korneti za sladoled
hu: Tölcséres jégkrém
it: Coni gelato
ja: コーンアイス
lt: Ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: IJshoorntjes

en: Vanilla ice cream cones
de: Eistüten mit Vanilleeis, Vanilleeistüten
fi: Vaniljajäätelötuutit
fr: Cônes vanille
he: גביעי גלידה וניל
hr: Kornete sladoleda od vanilije
lt: Vaniliniai ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: Vanille-ijshoorntjes

en: Chocolate-Pistachio ice cream cones
fr: Cônes chocolat pistache, Cônes pistache chocolat
hr: Korneti sladoleda od čokolade i pistacija
lt: Šokolado-pistacijų ledai vafliniame ragelyje
nl: Chocolade-pistachehoorntjes